District of Columbia statutes.
42-518

Estates for years.

An estate for a determined period of time is an estate for years.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1352, ch. 854, § 1032

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-218.
1973 Ed., § 45-818.